Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 7. Election Officials.
§ 23-15-231.
Appointment of poll managers; designation of bailiff.

Before every election, the election commissioners shall appoint three (3) persons for each voting precinct to be poll managers, one (1) of whom shall be designated by the election commissioners as election bailiff. For general and special elections, the poll managers shall not all be of the same political party if suitable persons of different political parties can be found in the district. If any person appointed shall fail to attend and serve, the poll managers present, if any, may designate someone to fill his or her place; and if the election commissioners fail to make the appointments or in case of the failure of all those appointed to attend and serve, any three (3) qualified electors present when the polls should be opened may act as poll managers. Provided, however, any person appointed to be poll manager or act as poll manager shall be a qualified elector of the county in which the polling place is located.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-99 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 7; 1871, § 369; 1880, § 133; 1892, § 3643; 1906, § 4150; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6784; 1930, § 6214; 1942, § 3243; Laws, 1977 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 486, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 64; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-233.
Duties of poll managers.

The poll managers shall take care that the election is conducted fairly and agreeably to law, and they shall be judges of the qualifications of electors, and may examine, on oath, any person duly registered and offering to vote touching his or her qualifications as an elector, which oath any of the poll managers may administer.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-101 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art. 5 (14); 1857, ch. 4, art. 9; 1880, § 134; 1892, § 3644; 1906, § 4151; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6785; 1930, § 6215; 1942, § 3244; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 65; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-235.
Appointment of additional poll managers.

In addition to the poll managers appointed pursuant to Section 23-15-231, for the first five hundred (500) registered voters in each voting precinct, the election commissioners may, in their discretion, appoint not more than three (3) persons to serve as poll managers of the election. The election commissioners may, in their discretion, appoint three (3) additional persons to serve as poll managers for each one thousand (1,000) registered voters or fraction thereof in each voting precinct above the first five hundred (500), not to exceed six (6) additional poll managers under this section. Any person appointed as poll manager shall be a qualified elector of the county in which the voting precinct is located.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-103 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 7; 1871, § 369; 1880, § 135; 1892, § 3645; 1906, § 4152; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6786; 1930, § 6216; 1942, § 3245; Laws, 1980, ch. 486, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 66; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-237.
Oath of office for poll managers.

The poll managers shall be sworn by some officer present competent to administer oaths, or each may be sworn by one of the others, faithfully to perform their duties at the election according to law, and not to attempt to guide, aid, direct or influence any voter in the exercise of his or her right to vote, except as expressly allowed by law. The oath required by this section shall be recorded in the receipt book and signed by each poll manager.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-103 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 7; 1871, § 369; 1880, § 135; 1892, § 3645; 1906, § 4152; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6786; 1930, § 6216; 1942, § 3245; Laws, 1980, ch. 486, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 67; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-239.
Mandatory training of poll managers; single, comprehensive poll manager training program; certified poll managers.

[From and after January 1, 2020, this section shall read as follows:]

The executive committee of each county, in the case of a primary election, or the election commissioners of each county, in the case of all other elections, in conjunction with the circuit clerk, shall, in the years in which counties conduct an election, sponsor and conduct, not less than five (5) days before each election, not less than four (4) hours and not more than eight (8) hours of poll manager training to instruct poll managers as to their duties in the proper administration of the election and the operation of the polling place. Any poll manager who completes the online training course provided by the Secretary of State shall only be required to complete two (2) hours of in-person poll manager training. No poll manager shall serve in any election unless he or she has received these instructions once during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date upon which the election is held; however, nothing in this section shall prevent the appointment of an alternate poll manager to fill a vacancy in case of an emergency. The county executive committee or the election commissioners, as appropriate, shall train a sufficient number of alternates to serve in the event a poll manager is unable to serve for any reason.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate. The county executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate. The municipal executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement.

The board of supervisors and the municipal governing authority, in their discretion, may compensate poll managers who attend these training sessions. The compensation shall be at a rate of not less than the federal hourly minimum wage nor more than Twelve Dollars ($12.00) per hour. Poll managers shall not be compensated for more than sixteen (16) hours of attendance at the training sessions regardless of the actual amount of time that they attended the training sessions.

The time and location of the training sessions required pursuant to this section shall be announced to the general public by posting a notice thereof at the courthouse and by delivering a copy of the notice to the office of a newspaper having general circulation in the county five (5) days before the date upon which the training session is to be conducted. Persons who will serve as poll watchers for candidates and political parties, as well as members of the general public, shall be allowed to attend the sessions.

Subject to the following annual limitations, the election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount ofOne Hundred Dollars ($100.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in conducting training sessions as required by this section:

In counties having less than fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than five (5) days per year;

In counties having fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than eight (8) days per year;

In counties having thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than ten (10) days per year;

In counties having seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than twelve (12) days per year;

In counties having ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than fifteen (15) days per year;

In counties having one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than eighteen (18) days per year;

In counties having two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than nineteen (19) days per year;

In counties having two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents or more according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than twenty-two (22) days per year.

Election commissioners shall claim the per diem authorized in subsection (5) of this section in the manner provided for in Section 23-15-153(6).

To provide poll manager training, the Secretary of State has developed a single, comprehensive poll manager training program to ensure uniform, secure elections throughout the state. The program includes online training on all state and federal election laws and procedures and voting machine opening and closing procedures.

County poll managers who individually access and complete the online training program, including all skills assessments, at least five (5) days before an election shall be defined as “certified poll managers,” and entitled to a “Certificate of Completion.”

At least one (1) certified poll manager shall be appointed by the county election officials to work in each polling place in the county during each general election.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 68; Laws, 1989, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 592, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 565, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 326, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, 343, § 1; Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-240.
Appointment of student interns to serve during elections.

The officials in charge of the election in a county or municipality may, in their discretion, appoint not more than two (2) students for each precinct to serve as student interns during elections. To be appointed a student intern a student must:

Be recommended by a principal or other school official, or the person responsible for the student’s legitimate home instruction program;

Be at least sixteen (16) years of age at the time of the election for which the appointment is made;

Be a resident of the county or municipality for which the appointment is made;

Be enrolled in a public high school, an accredited private high school or a legitimate home instruction program and be classified as a junior or senior or its equivalent, or be enrolled in a junior college or a college or university; and

Meet any additional qualifications considered necessary by the officials in charge of the election in the county or municipality.

The duties of the student interns appointed pursuant to this section shall be determined by the officials in charge of the election in the county or municipality; however, the duties shall not include:

Determining the qualifications of a voter in case a voter is challenged;

The discharge of any duties related to affidavit ballots;

The operation and maintenance of any voting equipment;

Any duties normally assigned to a bailiff; or

The tallying of votes.

Student interns shall at all times be under the supervision of the poll managers of the election while performing their duties at precincts.

Before performing any duties, student interns shall attend all required training for poll managers of the county or municipality and any additional training considered necessary by the officials in charge of the election in the county or municipality.

As used in this section “officials in charge of the election” means the county or municipal executive committee, as appropriate, in primary elections and the county or municipal election commission, as appropriate, in all other elections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 521, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-241.
Election bailiff to keep peace.

The poll manager designated an election bailiff shall, in addition to his or her other duties, be present during the election to keep the peace and to protect the voting place, and to prevent improper intrusion upon the voting place or interference with the election, and to arrest all persons creating any disturbance about the voting place, and to enable all qualified electors who have not voted, and who desire to vote, to have unobstructed access to the polls for the purpose of voting when others are not voting.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-105 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (13); 1857, ch. 4, art 6; 1871, § 365; 1880, § 128; 1892, § 3638; 1906, § 4145; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6779; 1930, § 6217; 1942, § 3246; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 69; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-243.
Selection of election bailiff if none designated.

If the election commissioners fail to designate a poll manager as the bailiff, or if their designee fails to serve, the poll managers may select an election bailiff from among their number.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-107 [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 4; 1871, § 366; 1880, § 129; 1892, § 3639; 1906, § 4146; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6780; 1930, § 6218; 1942, § 3247; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 70; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-245.
Duties of election bailiff; polls to be open and clear.

It shall be the duty of the poll manager designated as bailiff to be present at the voting place, and to take such steps as will accomplish the purpose of his or her appointment, and the poll manager designated as bailiff shall have full power to do so and may summon to his or her aid all persons present at the voting place. A space thirty (30) feet in every direction from the polls, or the room in which the election is held, shall be kept open and clear of all persons except the election officials, individuals present to vote and credentialed poll watchers as defined by Section 23-15-577. The electors shall approach the polls from one (1) direction, line, door or passage, and depart in another as nearly opposite as convenient.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-109 [Codes, 1880, § 130; 1892, § 3640; 1906, § 4147; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6781; 1930, § 6219; 1942, § 3248; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 71; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-247.
Ballot boxes.

The election commissioners in each county shall procure, if not already provided, a sufficient number of ballot boxes, which shall be distributed by them to the voting precincts of the county before the time for opening the polls. The boxes shall be securely sealed from the opening of the polls on election day until the polls close on election day; and the box shall be kept by one (1) of the managers, and the manager having the box shall carefully keep it, and neither open it himself or herself nor permit it to be opened, nor permit any person to have any access to it throughout the voting period during an election. The box shall not be removed from the polling building or place after the polls are opened until the polls close and the count is complete. After each election the ballot boxes shall be delivered to the clerk of the circuit court of the county for preservation; and he or she shall keep them for future use, and, when called for, deliver them to the election commissioners.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-111 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (15); 1857, ch. 4, art 10; 1871, § 364; 1880, § 126; 1892, § 3637; 1906, § 4144; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6778; 1930, § 6220; 1942, § 3249; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 72; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-249.
Procedure when pollbooks or ballot boxes not distributed.

The failure to distribute to the different voting places the pollbooks containing the alphabetical list of voters, or the ballot boxes provided for, shall not prevent the holding of an election, but in such case the poll managers shall proceed to hold the election without the books and ballot boxes, and shall provide some suitable substitute for the ballot boxes, and conform as nearly as possible to the law in the reception and disposition of the official ballots.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-113 [Codes, 1880, § 145; 1892, § 3676; 1906, § 4183; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6817; 1930, § 6221; 1942, § 3250; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 73; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-251.
Duties of poll manager designated to receive and distribute ballots.

The election commissioners, in appointing the poll managers of an election, shall designate one (1) of the poll managers at each voting place to receive and distribute the official ballots, and shall deliver to him or her the proper number of ballots for his or her district not less than one (1) day before the election; and the poll manager receiving the ballots from the election commissioners shall distribute the same to the electors of his or her district in the manner herein provided. It shall be the duty of the designated poll manager for service at a voting place other than the courthouse, to carry to that voting place, on the day before the election, or before 6:00 a.m. on the morning of the election, the ballot box, the pollbook, the blank tally sheets, the blank forms to be used in making returns, the other necessary stationery and supplies and the official printed ballots aforesaid, and all of the same used and unused shall be returned by the designated poll manager to the election commissioners on the day next following the election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-127 [Codes, 1892, § 3660; 1906, § 4167; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6801; 1930, § 6228; 1942, § 3257; Laws, 1968, ch. 571, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 74; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-253.
Poll managers to be furnished stationery and blank forms.

The election commissioners shall furnish to the poll managers at each voting place a sufficient quantity of stationery for use in holding the election, and also blank forms to be used in making returns of the election, including the precinct opening and closing log, the election ballot account form and the electronic vote tally worksheet provided by the Secretary of State’s office.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-115 [Codes, 1892, § 3646; 1906, § 4153; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6787; 1930, § 6222; 1942, § 3251; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 75; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-255.
Voting compartments, shelves and tables; information required to be posted at precinct polling place on election day.

The supervisor of each respective supervisors district shall provide at each election place a sufficient number of voting compartments, shelves and tables for the use of electors, which shall be so arranged that it will be impossible for a voter in one (1) compartment to see another voter who is preparing his or her ballot. The number of voting compartments and shelves or tables shall not be less than one (1) to every two hundred (200) electors in the voting precinct.

The poll managers of each precinct shall publicly post the following information at the precinct polling place on the day of any election:

A sample ballot that will be used at the election;

The hours during which the polling places will be open;

Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a vote and how to cast an affidavit ballot;

Instructions for persons who have registered to vote by mail and first time voters, if appropriate;

General information on voting rights, including information on the right of an individual to cast an affidavit ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated; and

The consequences under federal and state laws regarding fraud and misrepresentation;

A list of voters in each polling place that have already cast an absentee ballot; and

The acceptable forms of photo identification that may be presented in the polling place.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-117 [Codes, 1892, § 3647; 1906, § 4154; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6788; 1930, § 6223; 1942, § 3252; Laws, 1978, ch. 390, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 76; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 14; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-257.
Duties of marshal or chief of police in municipal elections.

The marshal or chief of police shall perform, in respect to the municipal elections, all the duties prescribed by law to be performed by the board of supervisors in reference to furnishing voting compartments for state and county elections.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-17 [Codes, 1892, § 3033; 1906, § 3438; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5998; 1930, § 2600; 1942, § 3374-67; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 67; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 77, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-259.
Authority of boards of supervisors to allow compensation of officers rendering services in registration and elections and reasonable sum to supply voting compartments, tables and shelves.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties are authorized to allow compensation of the officers rendering services in matters of registration and elections, to provide ballot boxes, voter rolls as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System, and all other things required by law in registration and elections. The boards are also authorized, by order spread upon the minutes of the board setting forth the cost and source of funds therefor, to allow such reasonable sum as may be expended in supplying voting compartments, tables or shelves for use at elections.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-179 [Codes, 1892, § 3704; 1906, § 4211; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6847; 1930, § 6255; 1942, § 3284; Laws, 1976, ch. 350, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 397, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 78; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-261.
Certification of service as poll managers.

The election commissioners shall, after each election, make out a list of all persons who served as poll managers at the election, designating for what service each is entitled to pay, certify to the correctness of the same, and file it with the clerk of the board of supervisors. An allowance shall not be made to any such officer unless his or her service be so certified.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-181 [Codes, 1892, § 3705; 1906, § 4212; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6348; 1930, § 6256; 1942, § 3285; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 79; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-263.
Duties of county executive committees at primary elections.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the county executive committee at primary elections shall perform all duties that relate to the qualification of candidates for primary elections, print ballots for primary elections, appoint the primary election officers, resolve contests in regard to primary elections, and perform all other duties required by law to be performed by the county executive committee; however, each house of the Legislature shall rule on the qualifications of the membership of its respective body in contests involving the qualifications of such members. The executive committee shall be subject to all the penalties to which county election commissioners are subject, except that Section 23-15-217 shall not apply to members of the county executive committee who seek elective office.

A member of a county executive committee shall be automatically disqualified to serve on the county executive committee, and shall be considered to have resigned therefrom, upon his qualification as a candidate for any elective office. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a member of a county executive committee who qualifies as a candidate for a municipal elective office.

The primary election officers appointed by the executive committee of the party shall have the powers and perform the duties, where not otherwise provided, required of such officers in a general election, and any and every act or omission which by law is an offense when committed in or about or in respect to such general elections, shall be an offense if committed in or about or in respect to a primary election; and the same shall be indictable and punishable in the same way as if the election was a general election for the election of state and county officers, except as specially modified or otherwise provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3105 [Codes, 1906, § 3697; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6388; 1930, § 5864; Repealed, 1970, ch. 506, § 33; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 80; Laws, 1989, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 10, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-265.
Meeting of county executive committee; appointment of poll managers by committee.

The county executive committee of each county shall meet not less than two (2) weeks before the date of any primary election and appoint the poll managers for same, all of whom may be members of the same political party. The number of poll managers appointed by the county executive committee shall be the same number as election commissioners are allowed to appoint pursuant to Sections 23-15-231 and 23-15-235. If the county executive committee fails to meet on the date named, supra, further notice shall be given of the time and place of meeting.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate. The county executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate. The municipal executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3115 [Codes, 1906, § 3707; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6399; 1930, § 5873; Laws, 1962, ch. 565, § 1; repealed, Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 81; Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-266.
Executive committee authorized to enter into agreements regarding conduct of elections if certain criteria met.

A county or municipal executive committee shall be eligible to enter into written agreements with a circuit or municipal clerk or a county or municipal election commission as provided for in Section 23-15-239(2), 23-15-265(2), 23-15-267(4), 23-15-333(4), 23-15-335(2) or 23-15-597(2), only if the political party with which such county or municipal executive committee is affiliated:

Has cast for its candidate for Governor in the last two (2) gubernatorial elections ten percent (10%) of the total vote cast for governor; or

Has cast for its candidate for Governor in three (3) of the last five (5) gubernatorial elections twenty-five percent (25%) of the total vote cast for Governor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 1, eff June 20, 2001 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-267.
Primary election ballot boxes; penalty for failure to deliver ballot boxes.

The ballot boxes provided by the election commissioners in each county shall be used in primary elections, and the county executive committees shall distribute them to the voting precincts of the county before the time for opening the polls, in the same manner, as near as may be, as that provided for in general elections.

The boxes shall be securely sealed and locked beginning at the start of voting on election day until the end of voting on election day; and the box shall be kept by one (1) of the poll managers, and the poll manager having the box shall carefully keep it, and neither open it himself or herself nor permit it to be done, nor permit any person to have any access to it throughout voting during election day. The box shall not be removed from the polling place after the polls are open until the polls close and the count is completed.

After each election, the ballot boxes shall be delivered to the clerk of the circuit court of the county for preservation; and he or she shall keep them for future use, and, when called for, deliver them to the election commissioners.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate. The county executive committee shall notify the State Executive Committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate. The municipal executive committee shall notify the State Executive Committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

The person, or persons, whose duty it is to comply with the provisions of this section and who shall fail, or neglect, from any cause, to deliver the boxes or any of them as herein provided shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) and be imprisoned in the county jail of the residence of the person, or persons, who violates any of the provisions of this section, for a period of not less than thirty (30) days or more than six (6) months, and fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3126 [Codes, 1906, § 3712; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6404; 1930, § 5884; Laws, 1910, ch. 208; repealed, Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 82; Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-269.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 193, effective on or before July 1, 2017.

§23-15-269. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-161 [Codes, 1892, § 3669; 1906, § 4176; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6810; 1930, § 6246; 1942, § 3275; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 83, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-271.
Election integrity assurance committee.

The state executive committee of any political party authorized to conduct political party primaries shall form an election integrity assurance committee for each congressional district. The state executive committee shall appoint three (3) of its members to each congressional district election integrity assurance committee. The members so appointed shall be residents of the congressional district for which the election integrity assurance committee is formed. The state executive committee shall name a chair and a secretary from among the members of each committee. The state executive committee shall provide to each circuit and municipal clerk a list of the members of the congressional district integrity assurance committee for the congressional district in which the county or municipality of the clerk is located.

If within sixty (60) days of an election, a county executive committee or a municipal executive committee fails to attend training or perform in a timely manner any of the duties specified in Sections 23-15-239, 23-15-265, 23-15-267, 23-15-333, 23-15-335 and 23-15-597 and there is no written agreement in place between the county or municipal executive committee and the county or municipal election commission or the circuit or municipal clerk pursuant to such sections, or there is such an agreement in place and it is not being executed, the circuit or municipal clerk shall notify the chair and secretary of the congressional district election integrity assurance committee or the chair of the state executive committee of such failure and call upon them to take immediate and appropriate action to ensure that such duties are performed in order to secure the orderly conduct of the primary. Upon receiving the notice, the election integrity assurance committee shall be responsible for conducting any required training and shall be authorized to contract on behalf of the county or municipal executive committee with the county or municipal election commission or the circuit or municipal clerk for the conduct of the primary election.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the state executive committee or a congressional district election assurance committee to conduct primaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 2017.